Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.080

Investment pool—Annual summary of activity.

At the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall submit to the governor, the state auditor, and the joint legislative audit and review committee a summary of the activity of the investment pool. The summary shall indicate the quantity of funds deposited; the earnings of the pool; the investments purchased, sold, or exchanged; the administrative expenses of the investment pool; and such other information as the state treasurer deems relevant.

[ 1996 c 288 s 48; 1986 c 294 s 8.]